nl: Contragewicht vulmateriaal: Composiet; Beton; Grind; Loodhagel; Voorgevuld; Zand; Zand of water; Massief rubber; Staal; Water; Overige
da: Modvægtens fyldmateriale: Komposit; Beton; Grus; Blyhagl; Forudfyldt; Sand; Sand eller vand; Massivt gummi; Stål; Vand; Andet
el: Υλικό πλήρωσης αντίβαρου: Σύνθετο; Σκυρόδεμα; Χαλίκι; Σκάγια μολύβδου; Προγεμισμένο; Άμμος; Άμμος ή νερό; Συμπαγές καουτσούκ; Ατσάλι; Νερό; Άλλο
sl-SI: Polnilni material za protiuteži: Kompozit; Beton; Gramoz; Svinčene šibre; Predhodno napolnjeno; Pesek; Pesek ali voda; Polna guma; Jeklo; Voda; Drugo
fr: Matériau de remplissage du contrepoids: Composite; Béton; Gravier; Grenaille de plomb; Prérempli; Sable; Sable ou eau; Caoutchouc massif; Acier; Eau; Autre
pt-BR: Material de enchimento do contrapeso: Composto; Concreto; Cascalho; Chumbinho; Pré-preenchido; Areia; Areia ou água; Borracha maciça; Aço; Água; Outros
zh-TW: 配重填充材質: 複合材質; 混凝土; 礫石; 鉛粒; 預填; 沙子; 沙子或水; 實心橡膠; 鋼; 水; 其他
sk-SK: Výplňový materiál protizávažia: Kompozit; Betón; Štrk; Olovené broky; Vopred naplnené; Piesok; Piesok alebo voda; Pevná guma; Oceľ; Voda; Iné
th: วัสดุสำหรับบรรจุตุ้มถ่วง: คอมโพสิต; คอนกรีต; กรวด; เม็ดตะกั่ว; บรรจุสำเร็จ; ทราย; ทรายหรือน้ำ; ยางตัน; เหล็กกล้า; น้ำ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Material de enchimento do contrapeso: Compósito; Betão; Gravilha; Granulado de chumbo; Pré-preenchido; Areia; Areia ou água; Borracha maciça; Aço; Água; Outro
zh-CN: 配重填充材料: 复合材料; 混凝土; 砾石; 铅丸; 预填充; 沙子; 沙子或水; 实心橡胶; 钢; 水; 其他
pl: Materiał wypełnienia przeciwwagi: Kompozyt; Beton; Żwir; Śrut ołowiany; Wstępnie napełniony; Piasek; Piasek lub woda; Pełna guma; Stal; Woda; Inny
it: Materiale di riempimento del contrappeso: Materiale composito; Cemento; Ghiaia; Pallini di piombo; Preriempito; Sabbia; Sabbia o acqua; Gomma piena; Acciaio; Acqua; Altro
sv: Motviktsfyllningsmaterial: Komposit; Betong; Grus; Blyhagel; Förfylld; Sand; Sand eller vatten; Massivt gummi; Stål; Vatten; Övrigt
ru: Материал заполнения противовеса: Композитный материал; Бетон; Гравий; Свинцовая дробь; С наполнителем; Песок; Песок или вода; Цельная резина; Сталь; Вода; Другое
vi: Vật liệu làm đầy đối trọng: Composite; Bê tông; Sỏi; Đạn chì; Nhồi sẵn; Cát; Cát hoặc nước; Cao su đặc; Thép; Nước; Khác
tr: Karşı ağırlık dolgu malzemesi: Kompozit; Beton; Çakıl; Kurşun saçma; Önceden doldurulmuş; Kum; Kum veya su; Sert kauçuk; Çelik; Su; Diğer
ro-RO: Material de umplutură contragreutate: Material compozit; Beton; Pietriș; Alice de plumb; Preumplut; Nisip; Nisip sau apă; Cauciuc solid; Oțel; Apă; Altele
hr-HR: Materijal za punjenje protutega: Kompozit; Beton; Šljunak; Olovna sačma; Unaprijed napunjeno; Pijesak; Pijesak ili voda; Puna guma; Čelik; Voda; Ostalo
lt-LT: Atsvaros užpildo medžiaga: Kompozitas; Betonas; Žvyras; Švino šratai; Užpildyta iš anksto; Smėlis; Smėlis arba vanduo; Kietoji guma; Plienas; Vanduo; Kita
bg-BG: Материал за пълнеж на противотежест: Композитни материали; Бетон; Чакъл; Оловни сачми; Предварително напълнени; Пясък; Пясък или вода; Плътна гума; Стомана; Вода; Други
fi: Vastapainon täytemateriaali: Komposiitti; Betoni; Sora; Lyijyhaulit; Esitäytetty; Hiekka; Hiekka tai vesi; Umpikumi; Teräs; Vesi; Muu
hu: Ellensúly töltőanyaga: Kompozit; Beton; Kavics; Sörét; Előre töltött; Homok; Homok vagy víz; Tömör gumi; Acél; Víz; Egyéb
en: Counterweight fill material: Composite; Concrete; Gravel; Lead shot; Pre-filled; Sand; Sand or water; Solid rubber; Steel; Water; Other
es: Material de relleno de contrapeso: Compuesto; Concreto; Grava; Perdigones de plomo; Prellenado; Arena; Arena o agua; Caucho macizo; Acero; Agua; Otro
ko: 카운터웨이트 충전재: 합성 소재; 콘크리트; 자갈; 납탄; 충전재 포함; 모래; 모래 또는 물; 솔리드 고무; 스틸; 물; 기타
de: Füllmaterial des Gegengewichts: Verbundwerkstoff; Beton; Kies; Bleischrot; Vorgefüllt; Sand; Sand oder Wasser; Vollgummi; Stahl; Wasser; Andere
nb: Motvektsfyllmateriale: Kompositt; Betong; Grus; Blyhagl; Ferdigfylt; Sand; Sand eller vann; Massiv gummi; Stål; Vann; Annet
ja: カウンターウェイト充填材: 複合材; コンクリート; 砂利; 鉛散弾; 充填済み; 砂; 砂または水; ソリッドラバー; スチール; 水; その他
cs: Výplňový materiál protizávaží: Kompozit; Beton; Štěrk; Olověné broky; Předem naplněno; Písek; Písek nebo voda; Tvrdá guma; Ocel; Voda; Ostatní